Hawaii, session 2026, SB439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 184, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§184-     User fees; state parks; trails; nonresidents.  (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to impose user fees that solely apply to nonresidents visiting state parks and trails; provided that: (1)  The board shall conduct studies to determine those state parks and trails to which the user fees should be applied; (2)  The board may designate the state parks and trails to which the user fees shall apply; (3)  The board may adopt seasonal pricing regarding user fees for state parks and trails; (4)  Any user fee established pursuant to this section shall be adjusted over time for inflation, based on the Consumer Price Index in the Honolulu area as reported by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics; (5)  The board may reduce, increase, or repeal any user fee by adopting, amending, or repealing rules pursuant to chapter 91; (6)  The proceeds of any user fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the state parks special fund established pursuant to section 184-3.4; and (7)  This section shall not be construed to impose a minimum amount for any user fee or establish a minimum number of state parks or trails to which user fees shall apply. (b)  As used in this section: "Board" means the board of land and natural resources. "Seasonal pricing" means a mechanism that adjusts user fees in response to fluctuations in demand throughout the year." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.